test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_ciermih_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čiermih: # ok 1B d-kk,  rm-ˊrm
    čiermih+N+Sg+Nom: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Gen: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Acc: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Ill: čieˊrmihân
    čiermih+N+Sg+Loc: čieˊrmihist
    čiermih+N+Sg+Com: čieˊrmiháin
    čiermih+N+Sg+Abe: čiermihttáá
    čiermih+N+Ess: čieˊrmihin
    čiermih+N+Par: čieˊrmihid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Nom: čieˊrmiheh
    čiermih+N+Pl+Gen: čieˊrmihij
    čiermih+N+Pl+Acc: čieˊrmihijd
    čiermih+N+Pl+Ill: čieˊrmiháid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Loc: čieˊrmihijn
    čiermih+N+Pl+Com: čieˊrmihijguin
    čiermih+N+Pl+Abe: čieˊrmihijttáá
